Utah statutes.
78A-10-302.   Membership.
(1)  The Trial Court Nominating Commission shall consist of seven
commissioners, each appointed by the governor to serve a single four-year
term.
(2)  Each commissioner shall:
(a)  be a United States citizen;
(b)  be a resident of Utah;
(c)  be a resident of the geographic division to be served by the commission
to which the commissioner is appointed; and
(d)  serve until the commissioner's successor is appointed.
(3)  The governor may not appoint:
(a)  a commissioner to serve successive terms;
(b)  a member of the Legislature to serve as a member of a Trial Court
Nominating Commission; or
(c)  more than four commissioners from the same political party to a Trial
Court Nominating Commission.
(4)  The governor shall appoint two commissioners from a list of nominees
provided by the Utah State Bar.
(5)  The Utah State Bar shall submit:
(a)  six nominees from Districts 2, 3, and 4; and
(b)  four nominees from Districts 1, 5, 6, 7, and 8.
(6)  The governor may reject any list and request a new list of nominees.
(7)  The governor may not appoint more than four persons who are members of
the Utah State Bar to a Trial Court Nominating Commission.
(8)  The chief justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint another member of
the Judicial Council to serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of each Trial
Court Nominating Commission.
(9)  The governor shall appoint the chair of each Trial Court Nominating
Commission from among its membership.
